Alabama, session 2026rs, SB340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 37-15-4.1, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§37-15-4.1
(a) Any person may submit a design or survey locate
request to the One-Call Notification System. The design or
survey locate request shall describe the tract or parcel of
land for which the design or survey locate request has been
submitted with sufficient particularity as defined by policies
Page 2

submitted with sufficient particularity as defined by policies
SB340 INTRODUCED
developed and promulgated by the One-Call Notification System
to enable the facility operator to ascertain the precise tract
or parcel of land involved and state the name, address,
telephone number, and facsimile number of the person who has
submitted the design or survey locate request and the company
name of the project owner.
(b) Within five working days after a design or survey
locate request has been submitted to the One-Call Notification
System for a proposed project, the operator shall respond by
one of the following methods:
(1) Marking mark the approximate location of all
underground facilities in the area of proposed excavation.
(2) Providing to the person submitting the design or
survey locate request the best available description of all
underground facilities in the area of proposed excavation
which may include drawings of underground facilities already
built in the area or other facility records that are
maintained by the facility operator.
(3) Allowing the person submitting the design or survey
locate request or any other authorized person to inspect or
copy the drawings or other records for all underground
facilities within the proposed area of excavation.
(c) An operator shall complete a design or survey
locate request that has not been completed within 20 calendar
days of submitting the request to the One-Call Notification
System before completing any other locate request or marking
any underground facilities in response to a notice of intent
to excavate or demolish pursuant to Section 37-15-6.
Page 3

to excavate or demolish pursuant to Section 37-15-6.
SB340 INTRODUCED
(d) An operator shall be liable for any costs incurred
by a design or survey locate requestor due to a project being
delayed because the locate request remains incomplete 30
calendar days or more after being submitted to the One-Call
Notification System.
(e) A contract locator may not close a design or survey
locate request for purposes of the One-Call Notification
System.
(f) An operator may not close a design or survey locate
request for purposes of the One-Call Notification System
unless the operator has field-verified that the underground
facility has been marked."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4